Missouri, session 2026, HB2347.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 610.026, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 610.026, to read as follows:
610.026. 1. Except as otherwise provided by law, each public governmental body
shall provide access to and, upon request, furnish copies of public records subject to the
following:
(1) Fees for copying public records, except those records restricted under section
32.091, shall not exceed ten cents per page for a paper copy not larger than nine by fourteen
inches, with the hourly fee for duplicating time not to exceed the average hourly rate of pay
for clerical staff of the public governmental body. Research time required for fulfilling
records requests may be charged at the actual cost of research time. Based on the scope of the
request, the public governmental body shall produce the copies using employees of the body
that result in the lowest amount of charges for search, research, and duplication time. Prior to
producing copies of the requested records, the person requesting the records may request the
public governmental body to provide an estimate of the cost to the person requesting the
records. Documents may be furnished without charge or at a reduced charge when the public
governmental body determines that waiver or reduction of the fee is in the public interest
because it is likely to contribute significantly to public understanding of the operations or
activities of the public governmental body and is not primarily in the commercial interest of
the requester;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2347 2
(2) Fees for providing access to public records maintained on computer facilities,
recording tapes or disks, videotapes or films, pictures, maps, slides, graphics, illustrations or
similar audio or visual items or devices, and for paper copies larger than nine by fourteen
inches shall include only the cost of copies, staff time, which shall not exceed the average
hourly rate of pay for staff of the public governmental body required for making copies and
programming, if necessary, and the cost of the disk, tape, or other medium used for the
duplication. Fees for maps, blueprints, or plats that require special expertise to duplicate may
include the actual rate of compensation for the trained personnel required to duplicate such
maps, blueprints, or plats. If programming is required beyond the customary and usual level
to comply with a request for records or information, the fees for compliance may include the
actual costs of such programming;
(3) Members of the general assembly shall be exempt from paying all fees in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, except that a public governmental body may
impose a fee for the material cost of paper copies or records if paper copies are
requested.
2. (1) Payment of fees may be requested prior to fulfilling the request.
(2) A request for public records to a public governmental body shall be considered
withdrawn if the requester fails to remit all fees within ninety days, or within one hundred
fifty days if the requested fees are greater than one thousand dollars, of a request for payment
of the fees by the public governmental body, prior to fulfilling the request. The public
governmental body shall include notice to the requester that if the requester fails to remit
payment of the fees within ninety days, or within one hundred fifty days if the requested fees
are greater than one thousand dollars, then the request for public records shall be considered
withdrawn. If the public governmental body responds to a request for public records in order
to seek a clarification of the request and no response to the request for clarification is received
by the public governmental body within ninety days, or within one hundred fifty days if the
requested fees are greater than one thousand dollars, of sending the request for clarification,
then such request for public records shall be considered withdrawn. The request for
clarification by the public governmental body shall include notice to the requester that if the
requester fails to respond within ninety days, or within one hundred fifty days if the requested
fees are greater than one thousand dollars, then the request shall be considered withdrawn. If
the same or a substantially similar request for public records is made within six months after
the expiration of the ninety-day period, or within one hundred fifty days if the requested fees
are greater than one thousand dollars, and no fee was remitted for such request or no response
was received to the request for clarification, then the public governmental body may request
payment of the same fees made for the original request that has expired in addition to any
allowable fees necessary to fulfill the subsequent request. Any request for records to a public

HB 2347 3
governmental body that is pending on August 28, 2025, shall be considered withdrawn if the
requester fails to remit all fees by January 1, 2026. The provisions of this subdivision shall
not apply if a lawsuit has been filed against the public governmental body with regard to the
records that are the subject of the request under this subdivision.
3. Except as otherwise provided by law, each public governmental body of the state
shall remit all moneys received by or for it from fees charged pursuant to this section to the
director of revenue for deposit to the general revenue fund of the state.
4. Except as otherwise provided by law, each public governmental body of a political
subdivision of the state shall remit all moneys received by it or for it from fees charged
pursuant to sections 610.010 to 610.028 to the appropriate fiscal officer of such political
subdivision for deposit to the governmental body's accounts.
5. The term "tax, license or fees" as used in Section 22 of Article X of the
Constitution of the State of Missouri does not include copying charges and related fees that do
not exceed the level necessary to pay or to continue to pay the costs for providing a service,
program, or activity which was in existence on November 4, 1980, or which was approved by
a vote of the people subsequent to November 4, 1980.
✔